Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 6 Miscellaneous Provisions

47-14-90.
Reduction of benefits upon determination that available funds are insufficient; order of payment upon resumption of payments in full; liability of board for such reductions.

If the funds derived from the sources provided for in this chapter are not sufficient at any time to enable the board to pay, in full, each person determined to be entitled to benefits under this chapter, then the prorated percentage of such payments shall be made to each such person until the fund shall be replenished sufficiently to enable the board to resume such payments in accordance with this chapter. Before resuming such payments, all persons who received deficiency payments shall be paid in full. In no event shall the board or any member of the board be liable to any person for any deficiencies in payments made under this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1952, p. 238, § 11.

47-14-91.
Exemption of rights and benefits under this chapter from taxation; exemption from levy and sale, garnishment, attachment, or other process; assignability.

The right to any pension, allowance, or benefit; the right to the return of contributions; any optional benefit; or any other right accrued or accruing to any person under this chapter; and moneys under this chapter shall be exempt from any tax imposed by any state, county, municipal, or other political subdivision, except as provided in Code Section 48-7-27, and shall be exempt from levy and sale, garnishment, attachment, or any other process. Such funds and benefits shall not be assignable.

History.

Ga. L. 1952, p. 238, § 13; Ga. L. 1968, p. 381, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1449, § 7.